Arkansas, session 2025, HB1838.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 9-9-206 is amended to read as follows:
9-9-206. Persons required to consent to adoption — Consideration for
relinquishing minor for adoption.
(a) Unless consent is not required under § 9-9-207, a petition to
adopt a minor may be granted only if written consent to a particular adoption
has been executed by:
(1) The mother of the minor;
(2) The father of the minor if:
(A) The father was married to the mother at the time the
minor was conceived or at any time thereafter;
(B) The minor is his child by adoption;
(C) He has physical custody of the minor at the time the
petition is filed;
(D) He has a written order granting him legal custody of
the minor at the time the petition for adoption is filed;
(E) A court has adjudicated him to be the legal father
*LJH251*
03/18/2025 2:19:29 PM LJH251

HB1838
prior to the time the petition for adoption is filed;
(F) He proves a significant custodial, personal, or
financial relationship existed with the minor before the petition for
adoption is filed; or
(G) He has acknowledged paternity under § 9-10-120(a);
(3) Any person lawfully entitled to custody of the minor or
empowered to consent;
(4) The court having jurisdiction to determine custody of the
minor, if the legal guardian or custodian of the person of the minor is not
empowered to consent to the adoption; and
(5) The minor, if more than twelve (12) years of age, unless the
court in the best interest of the minor dispenses with the minor's consent;
and
(6) The spouse of the minor to be adopted.
(b)(1) The consent of a minor who is twelve (12) years of age or older
shall be given at the adoption hearing.
(2) The court may waive the requirement for the minor's consent
under subdivision (b)(1) of this section upon a finding by clear and
convincing evidence that the waiver is in the minor's best interest.
(b)(c)(1) A petition to adopt an adult may be granted only if written
consent to adoption has been executed by the adult and the adult's spouse the
adult consents at the adoption hearing and written or testimonial consent is
given by the adult's spouse, if the adult is married.
(2) The court may waive the requirement for the spouse's consent
under subdivision (c)(1) of this section upon a finding that the consent is
not possible or is being unreasonably withheld.
(c)(d) Under no circumstances may a parent or guardian of a minor
receive a fee, compensation, or any other thing of value as a consideration
for the relinquishment of a minor for adoption. However, incidental costs for
prenatal, delivery, and postnatal care may be assessed, including reasonable
housing costs, food, clothing, general maintenance, and medical expenses, if
they are reimbursements for expenses incurred or fees for services rendered.
Any parent or guardian who unlawfully accepts compensation or any other thing
of value as a consideration for the relinquishment of a minor shall be guilty
of a Class C felony.

03/18/2025 2:19:29 PM LJH251

HB1838
SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 9-9-208(a), concerning the manner that
consent to adoption shall be executed, is amended to read as follows:
(a) The required consent to adoption shall be executed at any time
after the birth of the child and in the manner following:
(1) If by the individual to be adopted, in the presence of the
court consent must be given or affirmed to the court at the adoption hearing;
(2) If by an agency, by the executive head or other authorized
representative, in the presence of a person authorized to take
acknowledgments;
(3) If by any other person, in the presence of the court or in
the presence of a person authorized to take acknowledgments; and
(4) If by a court, by appropriate order or certificate.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 9-9-208(d)(3), concerning when a parent
whose consent is required for adoption is not required to have limited,
independent legal representation, is amended to read as follows:
(3) This subsection shall not apply to an adoption if the
petitioner is:
(A) A stepparent whose spouse is a natural or adoptive
parent of the child to be adopted;
(B) Related to the child to be adopted within the second
third degree as defined in § 28-9-212; or
(C) Represented by an attorney pro bono in the adoption
proceeding.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 28-65-101 is amended to read as follows:
28-65-101. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Emergency guardianship" means a short-term guardianship
that is:
(A) Granted by the court when there is an imminent danger
to the life, health, or property of an incapacitated person under § 28-65-
218(a); and
(B) In effect for no more than fourteen (14) continuous
calendar days;
(1)(2) “Essential requirements for health or safety” means the
03/18/2025 2:19:29 PM LJH251

HB1838
health care, food, shelter, clothing, and protection without which serious
illness or serious physical injury will occur;
(2)(3) “Evaluation” means a professional assessment of the
abilities of the respondent and the impact of any impairments on the
individual's capability to meet the essential requirements for his or her
health or safety or to manage his or her estate;
(3)(4) “Guardian” means one appointed by a court to have the
care and custody of the person or of the estate, or of both, of an
incapacitated person;
(4)(5) “Guardian ad litem” means one appointed by a court in
which a particular proceeding is pending to represent a ward or an unborn
person in that proceeding;
(6) "Guardianship" means a court-monitored case where a guardian
has authority and responsibility to take care of another person, another
person's property, or both another person and that person's property;
(5)(7)(A) “Incapacitated person” means a person who is impaired
by reason of a disability such as mental illness, mental deficiency, physical
illness, chronic use of drugs, or chronic intoxication, to the extent of
lacking sufficient understanding or capacity to make or communicate decisions
to meet the essential requirements for his or her health or safety or to
manage his or her estate.
(B) “Incapacitated person” includes an endangered adult or
impaired adult as defined in § 9-20-103, who is in the custody of the
Department of Human Services.
(C) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to mean a
person is incapacitated for the sole reason he or she relies consistently on
treatment by spiritual means through prayer alone for healing in accordance
with his or her religious tradition and is being furnished such treatment;
(6)(8) “Least restrictive alternative” means the form of
assistance that least interferes with the legal capacity of the respondent to
act in his or her own behalf;
(7)(9) “Limited guardian” means one whose powers and authority
have been limited to the specific powers, authorities, and duties set forth
in the order of appointment;
(8) “Professional” means a physician, licensed psychologist, or
licensed certified social worker with training, experience, and knowledge of
03/18/2025 2:19:29 PM LJH251

HB1838
the particular alleged disability of the respondent;
(9)(10) “Relative” means the spouse, child, grandchild, parent,
grandparent, or sibling of a ward;
(10)(11) “Temporary guardian” means a guardian appointed pursuant
to under § 28-65-218(b); and
(11)(12) “Ward” means an incapacitated person for whom a guardian
has been appointed.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 28-65-107(c), concerning jurisdiction in a
guardianship case when the subject of the guardianship is also the subject of
an open case under the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, is amended to read as
follows:
(c)(1)(A) If a juvenile is the subject matter of an open case filed
under the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, § 9-27-301 et seq., the
guardianship petition shall be filed in that case if the juvenile resides in
Arkansas.
(B) If a guardianship is granted in a juvenile case under
subdivision (c)(1)(A) of this section, the court shall order a court clerk to
accept a guardianship order with a probate style and new case number as the
initiating document for a probate guardianship case.
(2) If the juvenile resides out of state through the Interstate
Compact on the Placement of Children, § 9-29-201 et seq., the guardianship
petition may be filed in Arkansas or it may be filed in the state in which
the juvenile resides, subject to approval by the receiving state.
(3) The Department of Human Services may intervene as a matter
of right in a guardianship action at any time in an emergency or temporary
guardianship case before the entry of a permanent guardianship order if:
(A) A guardianship action is initiated for a child or
adult in the custody of the department, including a seventy-two-hour hold;
and
(B) The custody of the child or adult is granted to a
party seeking guardianship.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 28-65-109 is amended to read as follows:
28-65-109. Actions by ward against guardian.
An action by a ward against his or her guardian for a settlement of his
03/18/2025 2:19:29 PM LJH251

HB1838
or her accounts, for additional security, or for his or her removal, must be
brought in the county in which the guardian was qualified shall be brought in
the court that has jurisdiction over the relevant guardianship case.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 28-65-202(c)(1) and (2), concerning
improper venue in a guardianship case, are amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) If it appears to the court finds at any time before the
termination of the guardianship that the proceeding was commenced in a county
of improper venue, the court shall order the proceeding transferred to
another the circuit court with proper venue.
(2) If it appears the court finds that the residence of the ward
or of the guardian has been changed to another county or, in case of
guardianship of the estate, that a transfer would be for the best interest of
the ward and his or her estate, then the court in its discretion may order
the proceedings transferred to another the proper circuit court.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 28-65-203(a)(1), concerning qualifications
for a natural person to be appointed guardian of the person and of the estate
of an incapacitated person, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) A natural person is qualified to be appointed guardian of the
person and of the estate of an incapacitated person if he or she is:
(A) A resident of this state;
(B) At least eighteen (18) years of age;
(C) Of sound mind; and
(D) Subject to the limitations in subdivision (a)(2) of
this section, either:
(i) Not a convicted and unpardoned felon; or
(ii) A convicted and unpardoned felon who has
disclosed his or her prior felony conviction and for whom the court has
entered written findings stating that, notwithstanding the felony conviction,
he or she is otherwise qualified after reviewing a certified copy of the
sentencing order or may request that the court take judicial notice of the
official sentencing order through the official online court records system
administered by the Administrative Office of the Courts.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 28-65-203(f), concerning requirements for a
03/18/2025 2:19:29 PM LJH251

HB1838
nonresident natural person appointed as resident agent to accept service of
process in a guardianship matter, is amended to read as follows:
(f)(1) A nonresident natural person possessing the qualifications
enumerated in this section, except as to residence, who has appointed a
resident agent to accept service of process in any action or suit with
respect to the guardianship and has caused the appointment to be filed with
the court, whether or not he or she has been nominated by the will of the
last surviving parent of a minor resident of this state to be appointed as
guardian of the minor, is qualified for the appointment.
(2) However, unless nominated by will, bond may not be dispensed
with.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 28-65-203(k) and (l)(1), concerning
circumstances in which a court may grant a guardianship of an adult in the
custody of the Department of Human Services and when a court may appoint a
guardian or permanent custodian of an adopted juvenile, are amended to read
as follows:
(k) A circuit court of this state shall not appoint a person or
institution as the permanent custodian or permanent guardian of the person or
estate of an adult in the custody of the department When an adult is in the
custody of the department, a circuit court shall not grant a full
guardianship of the adult unless:
(1) The department has evaluated the prospective guardian under
the department's authority under § 9-20-122 and promulgated department
policy; or
(2) The department has evaluated the prospective custodian under
the department's authority under § 9-20-122 and promulgated department
policy.
(l)(1) A circuit court of this state shall not appoint an unrelated
person, a related person that is not related within the fifth degree of
consanguinity, or an institution as a permanent custodian, or permanent
guardian more than a temporary guardianship of the person or estate of an
adopted juvenile unless at least twenty (20) days before the hearing the
prospective guardian files a written home study that has been conducted by a
licensed certified social worker.

03/18/2025 2:19:29 PM LJH251

HB1838
SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 28-65-204(a), concerning the preference
for a parent of an unmarried minor to be appointed guardian of the person of
the unmarried minor, is amended to read as follows:
(a) The parents of an unmarried minor, or either of them, if qualified
and, in the opinion of the court, suitable, shall be preferred over all
others for appointment as guardian of the person Except in the case of an
emergency guardian or temporary guardianship, a guardianship of a minor child
that removes custody from a parent or prevents a parent from having custody
of the minor child shall not be granted over the objection of the parent
unless there is clear and convincing evidence that the parent is unfit to
care for the child given the circumstances.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 28-65-205(b), concerning what shall be
included in a petition for a guardianship, is amended to read as follows:
(b) The petition shall state, insofar as can be ascertained:
(1) The name, age, residence, and post office address of the
incapacitated person;
(2) The nature of incapacity and purpose of the guardianship
sought in accordance with the classifications set forth in § 28-65-104;
(3) The approximate value and a description of the incapacitated
person's property, including any compensation, pension, insurance, or
allowance to which he or she may be entitled;
(4) Whether there is, in any state, a guardian of the person or
of the estate of the incompetent proposed ward;
(5) The residence and post office address of the person whom the
petitioner asks to be appointed guardian;
(6) The names and addresses, so far as known or can be
reasonably ascertained, of the persons most closely related to the
incapacitated person by blood or marriage;
(7) The name and address of the person or institution having the
care and custody of the incapacitated person;
(8) The names and addresses of wards for whom any natural person
whose appointment is sought is already guardian;
(9) The reasons why the appointment of a guardian is sought and
the interest of the petitioner in the appointment;
(10) A statement of the respondent's alleged disability;
03/18/2025 2:19:29 PM LJH251

HB1838
(11) A recommendation proposing the type, scope, and duration of
guardianship;
(12) A statement that any facility or agency from which the
respondent is receiving services has been will be properly notified of the
proceedings; and
(13) The names and addresses of likely witnesses others having
knowledge about the person's disability, property, or both.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 28-65-206 is amended to read as follows:
28-65-206. Single guardianship for two or more incapacitated persons.
When an application is made for the appointment of a guardian for two
(2) or more incapacitated persons who are children of a common parent, or are
parent and child or are husband and wife, it shall not be necessary that a
separate petition, bond, or other paper be filed for each incompetent, and
the guardianship of all may be considered as one (1) proceeding except that
the guardian shall maintain and file separate accounts for the estates of
each of his or her wards the proposed wards.

SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 28-65-207 is amended to read as follows:
28-65-207. Notice of hearing for appointment.
(a) Notice of the hearing for the appointment of a guardian need not
be given to any person:
(1) Who has signed the petition;
(2) Who has in writing waived notice of the hearing, except the
alleged incapacitated person proposed ward may not waive notice;
(3) Who actually appears at the hearing;
(4) Whose existence, relationship to the alleged incapacitated
person proposed ward, or whereabouts is unknown and cannot by the exercise of
reasonable diligence be ascertained;
(5) Other than the alleged incapacitated person proposed ward,
whom the court finds to be beyond the limits of the continental United States
or himself or herself incompetent incapacitated; or
(6) The alleged incapacitated person proposed ward if the court
finds that he or she is detained or confined by a foreign power or has
disappeared.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (a) of this section, before the
03/18/2025 2:19:29 PM LJH251

HB1838
court shall appoint a an emergency guardian, other than a temporary guardian,
notice of the hearing of the application for the appointment of the guardian
shall be served upon the following, if reasonably possible:
(1)(A) The alleged incapacitated person proposed ward, if over
fourteen (14) years of age or older, and the alleged incapacitated person
shall be notified of his or her rights under § 28-65-213. This notice shall
be served with the notice of hearing.
(B) The proposed ward shall be notified of his or her due
process rights under § 28-65-213.
(C)(i) If the purpose of the action is to establish an
adult guardianship, the proposed ward shall also be served with his or her
notice of the Ward's Bill of Rights in accordance with § 28-65-106(b).
(ii) The notices described under this subdivision
(b)(1) shall be served with the notice of hearing;
(2) The legal parents of the alleged incapacitated person
proposed ward, if the alleged incapacitated person is a minor;
(3) The spouse, if any, of the alleged incapacitated person
proposed ward;
(4) Any other person who is the guardian of the person or of the
estate of the alleged incapacitated person proposed ward, or any other person
who has the care and custody of the alleged incapacitated person proposed
ward, and the director of any agency from which the respondent is receiving
services;
(5) The Department of Human Services when the petition seeks
appointment of a guardian who, at the time the petition is filed, serves as
guardian of five (5) or more minor wards;
(6) If there is neither a known parent nor known spouse, at
least one (1) of the nearest competent relatives by blood or marriage of the
alleged incapacitated person proposed ward; and
(7) If Any other person or entity directed by the court:
(A) Any department, bureau, agency, or political
subdivision of the United States or of this state which makes or awards
compensation, pension, insurance, or other allowance for the benefit of the
ward or his or her estate;
(B) Any department, bureau, agency, or political
subdivision of the United States or of this state or any charitable
03/18/2025 2:19:29 PM LJH251

HB1838
organization, which may be charged with the supervision, control, or custody
of the incompetent person; or
(C) Any other person designated by the court.
(c)(1)(A) If the incapacitated person proposed ward is over fourteen
(14) years of age or older, there shall be personal service upon him or her
if personal service can be had is reasonably possible.
(B) Service on others may be had in any manner provided by
§ 28-1-112(b) or § 28-1-112(e).
(2) The court, for good cause shown, may reduce the number of
days of notice, but in every case at least twenty (20) days' notice shall be
given.
(3) It shall not be necessary that the person for whom
guardianship is sought proposed ward be represented by a guardian ad litem in
the proceedings.

SECTION 15. Arkansas Code § 28-65-208 is amended to read as follows:
28-65-208. Notice of other hearings.
Whenever notice of a hearing in a guardianship proceeding is required,
the notice shall be served upon the following who do not appear or in writing
waive notice of hearing:
(1) The guardian of the person;
(2) The guardian of the estate; and
(3) If directed by the court:
(A) Any department, bureau, agency, or political
subdivision of the United States or of this state which makes or awards
compensation, pension, insurance, or other allowance for the benefit of the
ward's estate;
(B) Any department, bureau, agency, or political
subdivision of the United States or of this state or any charitable
organization, which may be charged with the supervision, control, or custody
of the incapacitated person; or
(C) Any other person or entity whom the court may
designate.

SECTION 16. Arkansas Code § 28-65-209 is amended to read as follows:
28-65-209. Request for special notice of hearings.
03/18/2025 2:19:29 PM LJH251

HB1838
(a)(1) At any time after the issuance of letters of guardianship, any
department, bureau, agency, or political subdivision of the United States or
of this state which makes or awards compensation, pension, insurance, or
other allowance for the benefit of the ward's estate; or any department,
bureau, agency, or political subdivision of the United States or of this
state, or any charitable organization, which may be charged with the
supervision, control, or custody of the incapacitated person; or an
interested person may serve, in person or by attorney, upon the guardian or
upon his or her attorney and file with the clerk of the court where the
proceedings are pending, with a written admission or proof of service, a
written request stating that he or she desires written notice of all hearings
on petitions for: Any person or organization with an interest in a
guardianship proceeding may send a request to the guardian and file a copy of
the request with the county clerk under the proper case name and case number
to be notified of hearings in any guardianship matter.
(A) The settlements of accounts;
(B) The sale, mortgage, lease, or exchange of any property
of the estate;
(C) An allowance of any nature payable from the ward's
estate;
(D) The investment of funds of the estate;
(E) The removal, suspension, or discharge of the guardian
or final termination of the guardianship; and
(F) Any other matter affecting the welfare or care of the
incapacitated person and his or her property.
(2) The applicant for such a notice must include in his or her
written request his or her post office address or that of his or her attorney
The notice shall include an email address or a physical mailing address where
the notice may be delivered.
(3) Timely delivery via email or regular mail under subdivision
(a)(2) of this section shall constitute proper notice by the person required
to provide notice.
(b) Unless the court otherwise directs, upon filing the request, the
person shall be entitled to notice of all such hearings or of such of them as
he or she designates in his or her request the specific types of hearings
requested.
03/18/2025 2:19:29 PM LJH251

HB1838

SECTION 17. Arkansas Code § 28-65-210 is amended to read as follows:
28-65-210. Proof required for appointment of guardian.
Before appointing a guardian, the court must be satisfied shall find by
clear and convincing evidence that:
(1) The person proposed ward for whom a guardian is prayed is
either a minor or otherwise incapacitated;
(2) A guardianship is desirable necessary to protect the
interests of the incapacitated person proposed ward; and
(3) The person to be appointed guardian is qualified and
suitable to act as such.

SECTION 18. Arkansas Code § 28-65-211 is amended to read as follows:
28-65-211. Determination of incapacity — Evidence required.
(a) The fact of minority, disappearance, or detention, or confinement
by a foreign power shall be established by satisfactory clear and convincing
evidence.
(b)(1) In determining the incapacity of a person for whom a guardian
is sought to be appointed for cause other than minority, disappearance, or
detention, or confinement by a foreign power, the court shall require that
the evidence of incapacity include the oral testimony or sworn written
statement of one (1) or more qualified professionals, whose qualifications
shall be set forth in their testimony or written statements.
(2) If the alleged incapacitated person proposed ward is
confined or undergoing treatment in an institution for the treatment of
mental or nervous diseases a mental health facility or in a hospital or penal
institution, one (1) of the professionals shall be a member of the medical
staff of that hospital or institution facility.
(3) The court, in its discretion, may require the presence
before it of the person of the alleged incapacitated person.
(4) The court shall fix the fees to be paid to such examiners,
which shall be charged as part of the costs of the proceeding.
(c) The costs of the proceeding shall be paid by the petitioner, who
shall may be reimbursed therefor out of the estate of the incapacitated
person proposed ward, if a guardian is appointed.

03/18/2025 2:19:29 PM LJH251

HB1838
SECTION 19. Arkansas Code § 28-65-212 is amended to read as follows:
28-65-212. Evaluations.
(a)(1) A professional evaluation shall be performed prior to the court
hearing on any petition for an adult guardianship except when appointment is
being made: because
(A) Because of minority, disappearance, detention, or
confinement by a foreign power or pursuant to § 28-65-218; or
(B)(i) In a temporary guardianship hearing when the
proposed temporary guardian has been unable to obtain the necessary
evaluation despite reasonable efforts.
(ii) If a temporary guardianship must be granted in
the absence of an evaluation to protect the proposed ward or the ward's
property, the court shall immediately order an evaluation and set a second
temporary hearing with the benefit of the evaluation as soon as is practical,
but no later than thirty (30) days from the date of the first temporary
hearing.
(2) The evaluation shall be performed by a professional or
professionals with expertise appropriate for the respondent's alleged
incapacity physician, licensed psychologist, or licensed certified social
worker with training, experience, and knowledge of the particular alleged
disability of the respondent.
(b) The evaluation shall include the following:
(1) The respondent's medical and physical condition;
(2) His or her adaptive behavior;
(3) His or her intellectual functioning; and
(4) Recommendation as to the specific areas for which assistance
is needed and the least restrictive alternatives available.
(c)(1) If no professional evaluations performed within the last six
(6) months are available, the court will order an independent evaluation.
(2)(A) If the petition is granted, the cost of the independent
evaluation will be borne by the estate of the incapacitated person.
(B) In the event the petition is denied, the costs will be
borne by the petitioner unless otherwise ordered by the court for good cause
shown.
(d)(1) The Department of Human Services shall not be ordered by any
court, except the juvenile division of the circuit court, to gather records,
03/18/2025 2:19:29 PM LJH251

HB1838
investigate the respondent's proposed ward's condition, or help arrange for
appropriate professional evaluations, unless the court has first determined
all parties to the proceeding to be indigent and assistance provided by the
department is limited to actions within the State of Arkansas.
(2) The department shall issue rules to implement this
provision.
(e) Any existing evaluations made by the department of which the court
has notice must be considered by the court.

SECTION 20. Arkansas Code § 28-65-213 is amended to read as follows:
28-65-213. Rights Due process rights of wards and proposed wards.
(a) At the any hearing, the respondent ward or proposed ward shall
have the right to:
(1) Be represented by counsel;
(2) Present evidence on his or her own behalf;
(3) Cross-examine adverse witnesses;
(4)(A) Be present.
(B)(i) The petitioner or person with physical custody of
the respondent ward or proposed ward shall make reasonable efforts to ensure
that the respondent ward or proposed ward is present or otherwise able to
participate electronically for all hearings.
(ii) If the respondent ward or proposed ward is not
present at a hearing, the court shall:
(a) Inquire first as to the reasons for the
absence of the respondent ward or proposed ward; and
(b) Proceed after being satisfied in the
respondent ward's or proposed ward's absence only if presented with clear and
convincing evidence that it is not safe, appropriate, or possible for the
respondent ward or proposed ward to be present or otherwise participate
electronically; and
(5) Require the attendance by subpoena of one (1) or more of the
professionals who prepared the evaluation.
(b) The burden of proof by clear and convincing evidence is upon the
petitioner, and a determination of incapacity shall be made before
consideration of a proper disposition.
(c)(1) If the respondent ward or proposed ward is found to be
03/18/2025 2:19:29 PM LJH251

HB1838
incapacitated, the court shall determine the extent of the incapacity and the
feasibility of less restrictive alternatives to guardianship to meet the
needs of the respondent.
(2) If it is found that alternatives to guardianship are
feasible and adequate to meet the needs of the respondent ward or proposed
ward, the court may dismiss the action.
(3) If it is found that the respondent ward or proposed ward is
substantially without capacity to care for himself or herself or his or her
estate, a guardian for the person or estate, or both, shall be appointed.

SECTION 21. Arkansas Code § 28-65-214(c), concerning what an order
granting a guardianship shall specify, is amended to read as follows:
(c) The order shall specify the nature of the guardianship and the
amount of the bond to be given, if any.

SECTION 22. Arkansas Code § 28-65-215 is amended to read as follows:
28-65-215. Bond of guardian.
(a) If the guardianship is to be of the person only, the amount of the
bond shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), or the court may
dispense with the bond.
(b) At every accounting, the court shall inquire into the sufficiency
of the bond and of the sureties, and, if either or both are found
insufficient, the guardian shall be ordered to file a new or additional bond.
(c) If, by the terms of a will, the testator expresses the wish that
no bond be required of the person whom he or she requests to be appointed
guardian, that person may be relieved of giving a bond with respect to
property given by the will to the incapacitated person.
(d) Section The procedures described in § 28-48-201 et seq., with
respect to the bonds of personal representatives, shall be applicable to the
bonds of guardians, except that in fixing the amount of the guardian's bond,
the value of the real property, as distinguished from the income arising
therefrom, unless it is sold, shall not be taken into consideration and shall
not constitute property which may reasonably be expected to pass through the
hands of the guardian.
(e) Further, when the ward's estate is all in cash, the court may
dispense with the bond if the guardian deposits the entire estate on interest
03/18/2025 2:19:29 PM LJH251

HB1838
in a bank in Arkansas insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or
in a savings and loan association in Arkansas insured by the Federal Savings
and Loan Insurance Corporation or in a credit union in Arkansas insured by
the National Credit Union Administration and the value of the estate is not
greater than the amount of the maximum insurance provided by law for a single
depositor, and the bank or savings and loan association shall file with the
probate clerk of the circuit court an agreement not to permit any withdrawal
from the deposit except on authority of a circuit court order.

SECTION 23. Arkansas Code § 28-65-218 is amended to read as follows:
28-65-218. Emergency and temporary guardianships.
(a)(1)(A) If upon presentation of an emergency ex parte motion
accompanied by an affidavit or verified petition giving rise to specific
facts in appropriate detail the court finds that there is imminent danger to
the life or health of an incapacitated person or of loss, damage, or waste to
the property of an incapacitated person and that this requires the immediate
appointment of a guardian of his or her person or estate, or both, the court
shall issue an order appointing an emergency temporary guardian.
(B)(i) An ex parte emergency guardianship order shall
include a date and time certain, not to exceed fourteen (14) days from the
date on which the order is entered, for a hearing reviewing the allegations
in the emergency ex parte motion and consideration on whether a temporary
guardianship shall be granted.
(ii) Notice of the emergency order shall consist of
a copy of the petition for emergency guardianship, any accompanying documents
to the petition for emergency guardianship, and a copy of the emergency
guardianship order.
(iii) The notice under subdivision (a)(1)(B)(ii) of
this section shall be served immediately upon the necessary parties under §
28-65-207 with notice of the emergency review hearing or temporary hearing.
(C)(b)(1) The court may consider a petition for a temporary
guardianship at a hearing that was conducted following proper notice under §
28-65-207 regardless of whether an emergency guardianship has been requested.
(2) If the court finds clear and convincing evidence that a
temporary guardianship is necessary and appropriate to protect the ward or
the property of the ward after the hearing required under subdivision
03/18/2025 2:19:29 PM LJH251

HB1838
(a)(1)(B) or subdivision (b)(1) of this section or after a written agreement
or agreement in court by the necessary parties, the court may enter an order
granting temporary guardianship for a period of up to ninety (90) days from
the date of the emergency hearing.
(2)(3)(A) If the incapacitated person is an adult, the period
for the appointment of a temporary guardian shall not exceed ninety (90)
days.
(B) If the incapacitated person is a minor, on or before
the expiration of the ninety-day period and after a hearing on the merits or
an agreement by the necessary parties, the court may extend the temporary
guardianship for up to an additional one hundred eighty (180) days.
(3)(c)(1) Notice of the emergency hearing shall be given before the
hearing as required by subsections (b)-(d) of this section. However, notice
is not required with respect to a person whose whereabouts are unknown or
cannot by the exercise of reasonable diligence be ascertained If the
petitioner is unable to serve a necessary party who is entitled to notice of
an emergency hearing under subdivision (a)(1)(B) of this section, a hearing
regarding a petition for temporary guardianship under subdivision (b)(1) of
this section, or both, despite reasonable efforts, and a temporary
guardianship is granted, the petitioner shall make further reasonable efforts
to serve the necessary party with a copy of the pleadings and a copy of the
temporary guardianship order that includes notice of the right to request a
review hearing described in subdivision (c)(2) of this section.
(2)(A) A necessary party who was not timely served before the
temporary hearing may request a review hearing of the temporary order.
(B) If a review hearing is requested under subdivision
(c)(2)(A) of this section, the court shall schedule the review hearing as
soon as is reasonably possible for consideration on whether the temporary
order should be amended, ended, or continued in the same form.
(b) Immediate notice of the temporary guardianship order shall be
served by the petitioner upon the following:
(1) The ward, if the ward is at least fifteen (15) years of age;
(2) The parents of the ward, if the ward is a minor;
(3) The spouse, if any, of the ward;
(4) Any other person who is the guardian of the person or of the
estate of the ward, or any other person who has been the primary caregiver of
03/18/2025 2:19:29 PM LJH251

HB1838
the ward;
(5) The Department of Human Services when the temporary guardian
appointed serves as guardian of five (5) or more wards;
(6) If there is neither a known parent nor known spouse, at
least one (1) of the nearest competent relatives by blood or marriage of the
ward, if known; and
(7) If directed by the court:
(A) Any department, bureau, agency, or political
subdivision of the United States or of this state which makes or awards
compensation, pension, insurance, or other allowance for the benefit of the
ward or his or her estate;
(B) Any department, bureau, agency, or political
subdivision of the United States or of this state or any charitable
organization, which may be charged with the supervision, control, or custody
of the incompetent; or
(C) Any other person designated by the court.
(c) The notice shall include:
(1) A copy of the petition;
(2) A copy of the temporary order and order of appointment;
(3) Notice of a hearing date; and
(4) A statement of rights of the proposed ward as provided in §
28-65-207(b) and § 28-65-213.
(d) If the proposed ward is at least fifteen (15) years of age, there
shall be personal service upon him or her if personal service can be had.
Service on others shall be according to the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure
or as otherwise provided by the court.
(e) Notice need not be given to any person listed in § 28-65-
207(a)(1)-(6).
(f) Within fourteen (14) days of the entry of the temporary
guardianship order, a full hearing on the merits shall be held.
(g)(1) If the petitioner is unable to serve a person entitled to
notice under this section despite reasonable efforts, the petitioner shall
make further reasonable efforts after the full hearing on the merits to serve
the person with a copy of the original pleadings and a copy of the temporary
guardianship order.
(2) The respondent may request a subsequent review hearing
03/18/2025 2:19:29 PM LJH251

HB1838
before the court that shall be scheduled as soon as reasonably possible.
(h)(d) The temporary guardian shall make such reports as the court
shall direct.
(i)(e) In all other respects, the provisions of this chapter
concerning guardians shall apply to temporary guardians, and an appeal may be
taken from the order of appointment of a temporary guardian.
(j)(f) The letters issued to a temporary guardian shall state the date
of expiration of the authority of the temporary guardian.

SECTION 24. Arkansas Code § 28-65-221 is repealed.
28-65-221. Standby guardians.
(a) Without surrendering parental rights, any parent who is
chronically ill or near death may have a standby guardian appointed by the
court for the parent's minor children using the same procedures outlined in
this subchapter to establish a guardianship. The standby guardian's authority
would take effect as outlined in an order of standby guardianship, upon:
(1) The death of the parent;
(2) The mental incapacity of the parent; or
(3) The physical debilitation and consent of the parent.
(b)(1) The standby guardian shall immediately notify the court upon
the death, incapacity, or debilitation of the parent and shall immediately
assume the role of guardian of the minor children.
(2) The court shall enter an order of guardianship in
conformance with this section.

SECTION 25. Arkansas Code § 28-65-222 is amended to read as follows:
28-65-222. Parental appointment nomination of temporary guardian in
event of his or her death.
(a)(1) Except as provided in § 28-65-218 and in subdivision (a)(2) of
this section, a parent of a minor child may appoint one (1) or more persons
to act as a temporary guardian of his or her minor child in the event of the
death of the parent if the:
(A) Parent signs a notarized writing that includes the:
(i) Name and date of birth of the minor child for
whom the person is being appointed as guardian;
(ii) Name of each person being appointed as a
03/18/2025 2:19:29 PM LJH251

HB1838
guardian of the minor child; and
(iii) Sworn attestation of two (2) witnesses that
states and affirms that each witness witnessed the parent sign the notarized
writing;
(B) Notarized writing signed by the parent as required
under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section is no more than five (5) years
old; and
(C) Each person appointed by the parent as a guardian of
the minor child consents to the appointment in a signed and notarized
writing.
(2) An appointing parent may appoint two (2) people as co-
guardians of the minor child if the two (2) people are married to each other.
(3) Both parents of the minor child shall sign the notarized
writing required under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section if both parents
are alive.
(4) A parent may revoke or amend his or her appointment of a
guardian under this section at any time before his or her death.
(b)(1) An appointment of a guardian for a minor child under this
section is immediately effective upon the death of:
(A) The appointing parent if the other parent is deceased;
or
(B) Both appointing parents.
(2)(A) Upon the death of both appointing parents or an
appointing parent if the other parent is deceased, the guardian shall have
temporary guardianship of the minor child for no longer than forty-five (45)
days.
(B) A court may extend the time period of the initial
temporary guardianship for an additional ninety (90) days or terminate the
temporary guardianship for good cause.
(c) A person who is appointed by an appointing parent as a temporary
guardian of a minor child under this section and who is willing to become the
permanent guardian of the minor child shall follow the procedures required
under this chapter to obtain permanent guardianship of the minor child.
(d) Unless otherwise provided by law, a court shall comply with the
wishes of an appointing parent and appoint each person appointed by the
appointing parent as temporary guardian of the appointing parent's minor
03/18/2025 2:19:29 PM LJH251

HB1838
child as a permanent guardian of the minor child unless the person appointed
as guardian is determined to be unfit by the court.
(e) A notarized writing required under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this
section does not supersede a court order concerning child custody that exists
at the time of the death of one (1) or both parents.
(a) A parent of a minor child may nominate a person to be the guardian
of the minor child in the event of the death of the parent during the child's
minority.
(b)(1) If a parent of a minor child has nominated a person to be the
guardian of the minor child under subsection (a) of this section but another
legal parent is alive and fit, the court shall give the living legal parent
first consideration.
(2) If subdivision (b)(1) of this section does not apply and the
court finds the proof of nomination under subsection (a) of this section to
be clear and convincing, the court shall give first consideration of the
deceased parent's nomination under subsection (a) of this section.

SECTION 26. Arkansas Code § 28-65-401(b), concerning when a
guardianship may be terminated by the court, is amended to read as follows:
(b) A guardianship may be terminated by court order after such notice
as the court may require:
(1)(A) If the guardianship was solely because of the ward's
minority, and either the ward attains his or her majority or the disability
of minority of the ward is removed for all purposes by a court of competent
jurisdiction.
(B)(i) However, if the court finds upon a proper showing
by substantial competent clear and convincing evidence after a hearing that
it is in the best interest of the ward that the guardianship be continued
after the ward reaches majority, the court may order the guardianship to
continue until such time as it may be terminated by order of the court;.
(ii) The provisions of the Ward's Bill of Rights
described in § 28-65-106 shall apply to the hearing under subdivision
(b)(1)(B)(i) of this section; or
(2) If the ward becomes a nonresident of this state; or
(3) If, for any other reason, the guardianship is:
(A) No longer necessary; and
03/18/2025 2:19:29 PM LJH251

HB1838
(B) No longer in the best interest of the ward.

SECTION 27. Arkansas Code § 28-65-402 is amended to read as follows:
28-65-402. Restoration of capacity of ward.
(a) If any person alleges in writing, verified by oath, that any
person declared to be incapacitated, or addicted to habitual drunkenness, is
no longer incapacitated, or is no longer so addicted, the court in which the
proceedings were held shall cause the facts to be inquired into in such
manner as it may direct Upon the petition of the ward or an interested party
alleging that the ward is no longer incapacitated or is less incapacitated
than would require a full guardianship, the court shall:
(1) Conduct a hearing after the petitioner provides proper
notice under this chapter to all relevant parties to determine whether the
guardianship should be terminated or amended; and
(2) Make orders as necessary after the hearing under subdivision
(1) is held.
(b) If it is found that the person has been restored to capacity or
has reformed, he or she shall be discharged from care and custody, and the
guardian shall immediately settle his or her accounts and shall restore to
the person all things remaining in the guardian's hands belonging or
appertaining to him or her.















03/18/2025 2:19:29 PM LJH251